Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.430

Dog or cat purchase contracts.

A contract entered into on or after July 28, 2019, for the payment to repay a loan for the purchase of a live dog or cat, where a security interest is granted in the dog or cat, is void and unenforceable.

[ 2019 c 340 s 3.]

NOTES:

Construction—Additional remedies—Dog or cat ownership contracts—2019 c 340: See notes following RCW 63.10.070.